Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2619
Electronic Signatures in Global and
National Commerce Act.

The
provisions of the Nebraska Uniform Athlete Agents Act governing the legal
effect, validity, or enforceability of electronic records or signatures, and
of contracts formed or performed with the use of such records or signatures,
conform to the requirements of section 102 of the Electronic Signatures in
Global and National Commerce Act, Public Law 106-229, 114 Stat. 464 (2000),
as such act existed on January 1, 2009, and supersede, modify, and limit the
Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

Laws 2009, LB292, § 19.